software/EmEditor/Dictionaries/en_us_ru_ru.aff
SFX 22 Y 55
SFX 22   ще   щ            ще
SFX 22   ье   ий           ье
SFX 22   ь    ями          ь
SFX 22   ь    ям           ь
SFX 22   ь    ях           ь
SFX 22   ь    я            ь
SFX 22   ь    и            ь
SFX 22   ь    ем           ь
SFX 22   ь    ей           ь
SFX 22   ь    е            ь
SFX 22   ь    ю            ь
SFX 22   о    у            о
SFX 22   о    и            [ишч]ко
SFX 22   о    е            о
SFX 22   о    ами          о
SFX 22   о    ам           о
SFX 22   о    ах           о
SFX 22   о    а            о
SFX 22   о    0            [дгств]о
SFX 22   й    ями          й
SFX 22   й    ям           й
SFX 22   й    ях           й
SFX 22   й    я            й
SFX 22   й    и            ий
SFX 22   й    и            [юаеояу]й
SFX 22   й    ев           й
SFX 22   й    ем           й
SFX 22   й    е            [^и]й
SFX 22   й    ю            й
SFX 22   е    у            [цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    ями          [^цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    ям           [^цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    ях           [^цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    я            [^цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    й            ие
SFX 22   е    и            ие
SFX 22   е    ей           [^цижьщ]е
SFX 22   е    ами          [цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    ам           [цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    ах           [цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    а            [цжшщ]е
SFX 22   е    ю            [^цжшщ]е
SFX 22   0    ы            [^егхйкожьшщч]
SFX 22   0    у            [^ейоь]
SFX 22   0    ов           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX 22   0    ом           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX 22   0    м            о
SFX 22   0    м            е
SFX 22   0    и            [гхкжшщч]
SFX 22   0    ей           [жшщч]
SFX 22   0    е            [^ейоь]
SFX 22   0    ами          [^ейоь]
SFX 22   0    ам           [^ейоь]
SFX 22   0    ах           [^ейоь]
SFX 22   0    а            [^ейоь]

SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23   0     ment       .

SFX 24 Y 63
SFX 24   чься кся          чься
SFX 24   чься кся          [^е]чься
SFX 24   чься клось        чься
SFX 24   чься клись        чься
SFX 24   чься клась        чься
SFX 24   чь   кло          чь
SFX 24   чь   кли          чь
SFX 24   чь   кла          чь
SFX 24   чь   к            чь
SFX 24   чь   к            [^е]чь
SFX 24   зть  з            зть
SFX 24   зти  з            зти
SFX 24   ться ся           зться
SFX 24   ться лся          [^сз]ться
SFX 24   ться лось         [^с]ться
SFX 24   ться лись         [^с]ться
SFX 24   ться лась         [^с]ться
SFX 24   ть   ло           [^с]ть
SFX 24   ть   ли           [^с]ть
SFX 24   ть   ла           [^с]ть
SFX 24   ть   л            [^сз]ть
SFX 24   ти   ло           зти
SFX 24   ти   ли           зти
SFX 24   ти   ла           зти
SFX 24   сться лся          сться
SFX 24   сться лось         сться
SFX 24   сться лись         сться
SFX 24   сться лась         сться
SFX 24   сть  ло           [^ч].сть
SFX 24   сть  ли           [^ч].сть
SFX 24   сть  ла           [^ч].сть
SFX 24   сть  л            [^ч].сть
SFX 24   стись лся          стись
SFX 24   стись лся          [^е]стись
SFX 24   стись лось         стись
SFX 24   стись лись         стись
SFX 24   стись лась         стись
SFX 24   сти  ло           сти
SFX 24   сти  ли           сти
SFX 24   сти  ла           сти
SFX 24   сти  л            сти
SFX 24   сти  л            [^е]сти
SFX 24   ся   лось         [^аияь]ся
SFX 24   ся   лись         [^аияь]ся
SFX 24   ся   лась         [^аияь]ся
SFX 24   лзти лз           лзти
SFX 24   ечься ёкся         ечься
SFX 24   ечь  ёк           ечь
SFX 24   езти ёз           езти
SFX 24   есть ло           честь
SFX 24   есть ли           честь
SFX 24   есть ла           честь
SFX 24   есть ел           честь
SFX 24   есть ёл           честь
SFX 24   естись ёлся         естись
SFX 24   ести ёл           ести
SFX 24   ась  ось          ась
SFX 24   ась  ись          ась
SFX 24   а    о            а
SFX 24   а    и            а
SFX 24   0    ло           [^аияь]
SFX 24   0    ли           [^аияь]
SFX 24   0    ла           [^аияь]

SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25   0     's         .

SFX 26 Y 108
SFX 26   чься кутся        чься
SFX 26   чься кусь         чься
SFX 26   чь   кут          чь
SFX 26   чь   ку           чь
SFX 26   ыться оешься       ыться
SFX 26   ыться оется        ыться
SFX 26   ыться оетесь       ыться
SFX 26   ыться оемся        ыться
SFX 26   ыться оются        ыться
SFX 26   ыться оюсь         ыться
SFX 26   ыть  оешь         ыть
SFX 26   ыть  оете         ыть
SFX 26   ыть  оет          ыть
SFX 26   ыть  оем          ыть
SFX 26   ыть  оют          ыть
SFX 26   ыть  ою           ыть
SFX 26   ься  ся           уться
SFX 26   ься  ешься        чься
SFX 26   ься  ется         чься
SFX 26   ься  етесь        чься
SFX 26   ься  емся         чься
SFX 26   ься  ёшься        чься
SFX 26   ься  ётся         чься
SFX 26   ься  ётесь        чься
SFX 26   ься  ёмся         чься
SFX 26   ь    ешь          чь
SFX 26   ь    ете          чь
SFX 26   ь    ет           чь
SFX 26   ь    ем           чь
SFX 26   ь    ёшь          чь
SFX 26   ь    ёте          чь
SFX 26   ь    ёт           чь
SFX 26   ь    ём           чь
SFX 26   уться ешься        уться
SFX 26   уться ется         уться
SFX 26   уться етесь        уться
SFX 26   уться емся         уться
SFX 26   уть  у            уть
SFX 26   уть  ешь          уть
SFX 26   уть  ете          уть
SFX 26   уть  ет           уть
SFX 26   уть  ем           уть
SFX 26   ться сь           уться
SFX 26   ться ешься        [ае]ться
SFX 26   ться ется         [ае]ться
SFX 26   ться етесь        [ае]ться
SFX 26   ться емся         [ае]ться
SFX 26   ться ются         [ае]ться
SFX 26   ться юсь          [ае]ться
SFX 26   ть   т            уть
SFX 26   ть   ешь          [ае]ть
SFX 26   ть   ете          [ае]ть
SFX 26   ть   ет           [ае]ть
SFX 26   ть   ем           [ае]ть
SFX 26   ть   ют           [ае]ть
SFX 26   ть   ю            [ае]ть
SFX 26   тись утся         [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись усь          [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись ешься        [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись ется         [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись етесь        [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись емся         [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись дутся        йтись
SFX 26   тись дусь         йтись
SFX 26   тись дешься       йтись
SFX 26   тись дется        йтись
SFX 26   тись детесь       йтись
SFX 26   тись демся        йтись
SFX 26   тись дёшься       йтись
SFX 26   тись дётся        йтись
SFX 26   тись дётесь       йтись
SFX 26   тись дёмся        йтись
SFX 26   тись ёшься        [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись ётся         [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись ётесь        [сз]тись
SFX 26   тись ёмся         [сз]тись
SFX 26   ти   ут           [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   у            [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   ешь          [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   ете          [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   ет           [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   ем           [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   дут          йти
SFX 26   ти   ду           йти
SFX 26   ти   дешь         йти
SFX 26   ти   дете         йти
SFX 26   ти   дет          йти
SFX 26   ти   дем          йти
SFX 26   ти   дёшь         йти
SFX 26   ти   дёте         йти
SFX 26   ти   дёт          йти
SFX 26   ти   дём          йти
SFX 26   ти   ёшь          [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   ёте          [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   ёт           [сз]ти
SFX 26   ти   ём           [сз]ти
SFX 26   оться ешься        оться
SFX 26   оться ется         оться
SFX 26   оться етесь        оться
SFX 26   оться емся         оться
SFX 26   оться ются         оться
SFX 26   оться юсь          оться
SFX 26   оть  ешь          оть
SFX 26   оть  ете          оть
SFX 26   оть  ет           оть
SFX 26   оть  ем           оть
SFX 26   оть  ют           оть
SFX 26   оть  ю            оть

SFX 27 Y 3
SFX 27   e     ion        e
SFX 27   y     ication    y
SFX 27   0     en         [^ey]

SFX 28 Y 17
SFX 28   ь    ями          [^жшщч]ь
SFX 28   ь    ям           [^жшщч]ь
SFX 28   ь    ях           [^жшщч]ь
SFX 28   ь    и            ь
SFX 28   ь    ей           ь
SFX 28   ь    ами          [жшщч]ь
SFX 28   ь    ам           [жшщч]ь
SFX 28   ь    ах           [жшщч]ь
SFX 28   0    у            [^ь]
SFX 28   0    ов           [^цжьшщч]
SFX 28   0    ом           [^цжьшщч]
SFX 28   0    е            [^ь]
SFX 28   0    ами          [^ь]
SFX 28   0    ам           [^ь]
SFX 28   0    ах           [^ь]
SFX 28   0    а            [^ь]
SFX 28   0    ю            ь
